Illinois, session 104th, HB3337.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illiana Task Force Act.  6    Section 5. Illiana Task Force; creation.7    (a) The Illiana Task Force, consisting of 24 police 8officers, is established. The members shall be appointed by 9the Director of the Illinois State Police. The members of the 10Task Force shall select from their number a chairperson. 11Members of the Task Force shall receive no compensation for 12their service on the Task Force but shall be reimbursed for 13necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties 14from appropriations made by the General Assembly for that 15purpose.16    (b) The Task Force shall meet at least once monthly to 17study ways to reduce violence in local communities caused by 18the illegal use of firearms and to make recommendations to the 19Governor and the General Assembly on suggested legislative 20solutions to this problem. 21    (c) The Task Force shall submit an annual report to the 22Governor and the General Assembly on or before December 31 of 23each year and a final report 5 years after the creation of the   HB3337- 2 -LRB104 06577 RLC 16613 b1Task Force.  2    Section 10. Dissolving of Task Force. The Task Force is 3dissolved 6 years after its creation. 4    Section 15. Repeal. This Act is repealed on January 1, 52032. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.